Louisiana, session 2026, HB716.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. The Chalmette Ferry terminal connecting the city of Chalmette, parish of
6 St. Bernard, with Algiers Point, a neighborhood in the city of New Orleans, shall be known
7 and is hereby designated as the "Michael C. Ginart, Jr., Ferry Terminal".
8 Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development shall work in
9 conjunction with the New Orleans Regional Transit Authority to create and erect the
10 appropriate signage reflecting this designation.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1